Wisconsin, session 2025, AB659.
do enact as follows:AB659,11Section 1. 36.27 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,2,5236.27 (2) (b) 4. A person who was a resident of this state at the time of entry 3into active duty, who is a resident of and living in this state at the time of 4registering at an institution, and who is a veteran, as defined in s. 45.01 (12), is 5entitled to the exemption under par. (a).AB659,26Section 2. 36.27 (3n) (a) 1m. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,2,14736.27 (3n) (a) 1m. a. A person who has served on active duty under honorable 8conditions in the U.S. armed forces, in forces incorporated as part of the U.S. armed 9forces, in the national guard, or in a reserve component of the U.S. armed forces; 10who was a resident of this state at the time of entry into that service or resided in 11this state for at least 5 3 consecutive years after the person attained the age of 18; 12and who, while a resident of this state, died on active duty, died as the result of a 13service-connected disability, or died in the line of duty while on active or inactive 14duty for training purposes.AB659,315Section 3. 36.27 (3n) (a) 1m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,3,21636.27 (3n) (a) 1m. b. A person who was a resident of this state at the time of 17entry into service described in subd. 1m. a. or resided in this state for at least 5 3 18consecutive years immediately preceding the beginning of any semester or session 19for which the person’s spouse or child described in par. (b) 1., 2., or 3. registers at an 1institution, and who the U.S. department of veteran affairs has awarded at least a 230 percent service-connected disability rating under 38 USC 1114 or 1134.AB659,43Section 4. 36.27 (3n) (bd) of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,3,9436.27 (3n) (bd) If an eligible veteran was not a resident of this state at the 5time of entry into service described in par. (a) 1m. a., the board may grant a 6remission of academic fees and segregated fees under this subsection only if the 7eligible veteran’s spouse or child described in par. (b) 1., 2., or 3. has resided in this 8state for at least 5 3 consecutive years immediately preceding the spouse’s or 9child’s enrollment in an institution.AB659,510Section 5. 36.27 (3p) (a) 1r. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,3,171136.27 (3p) (a) 1r. (intro.) “Veteran” means a person who is verified by the 12department of veterans affairs as being a resident of this state for purposes of 13receiving benefits under ch. 45; as being a resident of this state at the time of his or 14her entry into the U.S. armed forces or forces incorporated in the U.S. armed forces 15or as being a resident of this state for at least 5 3 consecutive years immediately 16preceding the beginning of any semester or session for which the person registers at 17an institution; and as meeting any of the following conditions:AB659,618Section 6. 38.24 (7) (a) 1m. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,4,31938.24 (7) (a) 1m. a. A person who has served on active duty under honorable 20conditions in the U.S. armed forces, in forces incorporated as part of the U.S. armed 21forces, in the national guard, or in a reserve component of the U.S. armed forces; 22who was a resident of this state at the time of entry into that service or resided in 23this state for at least 5 3 consecutive years after the person attained the age of 18; 1and who, while a resident of this state, died on active duty, died as the result of a 2service-connected disability, or died in the line of duty while on active or inactive 3duty for training purposes.AB659,74Section 7. 38.24 (7) (a) 1m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,4,10538.24 (7) (a) 1m. b. A person who was a resident of this state at the time of 6entry into service described in subd. 1m. a. or resided in this state for at least 5 3 7consecutive years immediately preceding the beginning of any semester or session 8for which the person’s spouse or child described in par. (b) 1., 2., or 3. registers at a 9technical college, and who the U.S. department of veteran affairs has awarded at 10least a 30 percent service-connected disability rating under 38 USC 1114 or 1134.AB659,811Section 8. 38.24 (7) (bd) of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,4,171238.24 (7) (bd) If an eligible veteran was not a resident of this state at the time 13of entry into service described in par. (a) 1m. a., the district board may grant a 14remission of academic fees and segregated fees under this subsection only if the 15eligible veteran’s spouse or child described in par. (b) 1., 2., or 3. has resided in this 16state for at least 5 3 consecutive years immediately preceding the spouse’s or 17child’s enrollment in a technical college.AB659,918Section 9. 38.24 (8) (a) 1r. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,5,21938.24 (8) (a) 1r. (intro.) “Veteran” means a person who is verified by the 20department of veterans affairs as being a resident of this state for purposes of 21receiving benefits under ch. 45; as being a resident of this state at the time of his or 22her entry into the U.S. armed forces or forces incorporated in the U.S. armed forces 23or as being a resident of this state for at least 5 3 consecutive years immediately 1preceding the beginning of any semester or session for which the person registers at 2a technical college; and as meeting any of the following conditions:AB659,103Section 10. 39.49 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB659,5,8439.49 (2) (a) 2. If a deceased veteran was not a resident of this state at the 5time of entry into service, the board may not make a grant under subd. 1. for an 6eligible student who is a dependent of the deceased veteran unless the dependent 7has resided in this state for at least 5 3 consecutive years immediately preceding 8his or her enrollment in a private institution.AB659,119Section 11. Initial applicability.AB659,5,1110(1) This act first applies to the first semester or session beginning after the 11effective date of this subsection.AB659,5,1212